California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(d) The costs for the services of the factfinding panel and the mediator shall be equally divided between the parties, and shall include per diem fees, if any, and actual and necessary travel and subsistence expenses.

(e) If no individual is available to serve as a mediator or factfinder within the timelines specified in this section, the timelines shall be extended until the next
 mediator or factfinder is available.

(f) A county shall be subject to a withholding of 1991 Realignment funds as described in subdivision (h) pursuant to a schedule developed by the Department of Finance and provided to the Controller if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The parties have completed the process described in subdivisions (a) to (c), inclusive.

(2) The factfinding panel has issued findings of fact and recommended settlement terms that are more favorable to the employee organization than those proposed by the employer of record described in subdivision (a).

(3) The parties do not reach a collective bargaining agreement within 30 days after the release of the factfinding panel’s recommended settlement terms described in paragraph
 (2). The parties shall make every good faith effort to reach an alternative mutually accepted agreement within this timeframe.

(4) The collective bargaining agreement for IHSS providers in the county has expired.

(g) The Public Employment Relations Board shall provide written notification to the county and the employee organization within 15 days of determining that the county is subject to a withholding pursuant to subdivision (f). The board shall also notify the Department of Finance and the State Controller of the withholding assessment.

(h) The amount of the 1991 Realignment funding withholding pursuant to subdivision (f) shall be equivalent to 10 percent of the county’s prior fiscal year IHSS Maintenance of Effort requirement, as reported by the department, prior to applying any offsets pursuant to Section
 12306.17. This withholding shall continue once per fiscal year, each fiscal year, until the county enters into a collective bargaining agreement with the employee organization.

(i) Beginning July 1, 2026, any county that has not reached an agreement after the release of the factfinding panel’s recommended settlement terms released prior to June 30, 2026, shall have 90 days to reach an agreement with the employee organization. If no agreement is reached within 90 days, the withholding described in subdivision (f) shall occur on October 1, 2026.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 26, Sec. 19.   (AB 152)   Effective June 29, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

12301.7.

The annual administrative cost for any public authority or nonprofit consortium created pursuant to Section 12301.6, exclusive of any increase in provider wages or benefits or employer taxes when negotiated or agreed to by the public authority or nonprofit consortium, shall be shared by the state and the counties as prescribed in Section 12306.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 606, Sec. 27.   Effective October 3, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

12301.8.

(a) (1) A public authority or nonprofit consortium established pursuant to Section 12301.6, upon the request of an aged or disabled adult or that individual’s authorized representative, may assist an employer, as defined in paragraph (2), in obtaining a criminal background check conducted by the Department of Justice, as authorized pursuant to Section 15660, of a provider, as described in paragraph (3).

(2) For purposes of this section, an “employer” means
 an aged or disabled adult, or that individual’s authorized representative, who is ineligible for benefits under this chapter and who receives care by a provider as described in paragraph (3).

(3) For purposes of this section, a “provider” means a person who is unlicensed and provides nonmedical domestic or personal care to an aged or disabled adult who is ineligible to receive benefits under this chapter, in the adult’s own home.

(b) A public authority or nonprofit consortium may recover the costs of administering this section, including the cost to the Department of Justice for processing the criminal background check, from the individual making the request, as described in subdivision (a).

(c) No General Fund moneys shall be used to implement this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 2, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

12302.

Each county is obligated to ensure that services are provided to all eligible recipients during each month of the year in accordance with the county plan.

In order to implement such a plan, an individual county may hire homemakers and other in-home supportive personnel in accordance with established county civil service requirements or merit system requirements for those counties not having civil service, or may contract with a city, county, or city and county agency, a local health district, a voluntary nonprofit agency, a proprietary agency, or an individual or make direct payment to a recipient for the purchase
 of services.

County plans are effective upon submission to the department. In reviewing county plans the department shall assure that plans are in compliance with provisions of this article including compliance with Section 12301. In the event the department finds a county plan is not in compliance it shall take appropriate action to assure compliance.

The department shall monitor the actual monthly expenditures where available for services to assure compliance with the county plans. If the county’s expenditure pattern is not consistent with the plan, the department shall require the county to amend the plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1438, Sec. 3.   Operative July 1, 1988, by Sec. 7 of Ch. 1438.)
-------------------------------------------

12302.1.

(a) Contracts entered into by a county under Section 12302 shall be for terms not exceeding three years. In the event of a three-year contract, the county, at the end of the first contract term, may renew the contract for a second term not exceeding one year. The rate of reimbursement shall be negotiated consistent with regulations promulgated by the State Department of Social Services. For any extended contract, the rate shall reflect, but is not limited to, the following financial considerations:

(1) Actual expenditures by the contractor as documented during the first contract term and approved by the state.

(2) Changes in federal, state, or county program requirements.

(3) Federal and state minimum wage and contractual step merit increases.

(4) Statutory taxes.

(5) Insurance costs.

(6) Reasonable costs which have been approved by the county department of social services, as long as those costs do not increase unreimbursed county expenditures or lead to a reduction in client services, and those costs can be funded within the maximum allowable rates set by the department for in-home supportive services contracts and the
 county’s state allocation for in-home supportive services.

(7) Other reasonable costs over which the contracting parties have no control.

(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), the purchase of services regulations adopted by the department that govern county welfare departments shall also govern acceptable in-home supportive services contracting, including the methods used to advertise, procure, select, and award the contracts, and the procedures used to amend, renew, or extend an existing contract with the same contractor, including, in addition to rate changes, any other change in other terms of the contract. In no case shall the department’s regulations governing in-home supportive services contracting procedures differ from the contract procedures specified in the department’s purchase of service regulations for other services purchased by county
 welfare departments, except as required by federal law.

(2) The department may, through regulation, require until July 1, 2000, the prior review of all bid and contract documents for managed care contracts under Section 12302.7.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 206, Sec. 23.   Effective July 22, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

12302.2.

(a) (1) If the state or a county makes or provides for direct payment to a provider chosen by a recipient or to the recipient for the purchase of in-home supportive services, the department shall perform or ensure the performance of all rights, duties, and obligations of the recipient relating to those services as required for purposes of unemployment compensation, unemployment compensation disability benefits, workers’ compensation, retirement savings accounts, including payroll deduction IRA arrangements offered pursuant to the CalSavers Retirement Savings Program (Title 21 (commencing with Section 100000) of the Government Code), federal and state income tax, and federal old-age, survivors, and disability insurance benefits. Those rights, duties, and obligations include, but are not limited to,
 registration and obtaining employer account numbers, providing information, notices, and reports, making applications and returns, and withholding in trust from the payments made to or on behalf of a recipient amounts to be withheld from the wages of the provider by the recipient as an employer, including the sales tax extended to support services by Article 4 (commencing with Section 6150) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, and transmitting those amounts along with amounts required for all contributions, premiums, and taxes payable by the recipient as the employer to the appropriate person or state or federal agency. The department may ensure the performance of any or all of these rights, duties, and obligations by contract with any person, or any public or private agency.

(2) Contributions, premiums, and taxes shall be paid or transmitted on the recipient’s behalf as the employer for any period commencing
 on or after January 1, 1978, except that contributions, premiums, and taxes for federal and state income taxes and federal old-age, survivors, and disability insurance contributions shall be paid or transmitted pursuant to this section commencing with the first full month that begins 90 days after the effective date of this section.

(3) Contributions, premiums, and taxes paid or transmitted on the recipient’s behalf for unemployment compensation, workers’ compensation, and the employer’s share of federal old-age, survivors, and disability insurance benefits shall be payable in addition to the maximum monthly amount established pursuant to Section 12303.5 or subdivision (a) of Section 12304 or other amount payable to or on behalf of a recipient. Contributions, premiums, or taxes resulting from liability incurred by the recipient as employer for unemployment compensation, workers’ compensation, and federal old-age, survivors, and disability
 insurance benefits with respect to any period commencing on or after January 1, 1978, and ending on or before the effective date of this section shall also be payable in addition to the maximum monthly amount established pursuant to Section 12303.5 or subdivision (a) of Section 12304 or other amount payable to or on behalf of the recipient. Nothing in this section shall be construed to permit any interference with the recipient’s right to select the provider of services or to authorize a charge for administrative costs against any amount payable to or on behalf of a recipient.

(b) If the state makes or provides for direct payment to a provider chosen by a recipient, the Controller shall make any deductions from the wages of in-home supportive services personnel that are authorized by Sections 1152 and 1153 of the Government Code, as limited by Section 3515.6 of the Government Code, and for the sales tax extended to support services by Article 4
 (commencing with Section 6150) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(c) Funding for the costs of administering this section and for contributions, premiums, and taxes paid or transmitted on the recipient’s behalf as an employer pursuant to this section shall qualify, where possible, for the maximum federal reimbursement. To the extent that federal funds are inadequate, notwithstanding Section 12306, the state shall provide funding for the purposes of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 37, Sec. 62.   (AB 1817)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

12302.21.

(a) For purposes of providing cost-efficient workers’ compensation coverage for in-home supportive services providers under this article, the department shall assume responsibility for providing workers’ compensation coverage for employees of nonprofit agencies and proprietary agencies who provide in-home supportive services pursuant to contracts with counties. The workers’ compensation coverage provided for these employees shall be provided on the same terms as provided to providers under Section 12302.2 and 12302.5.

(b) A county that has existing contracts with nonprofit agencies or proprietary agencies whose employees will be provided workers’ compensation coverage by the department pursuant to subdivision (a), shall reduce the contract hourly rate by fifty cents ($0.50) per hour, effective on the date that the department implements this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 209, Sec. 1.   Effective August 11, 2003.   This version became inoperative on September 22, 2012, upon operation of the amendment by Stats. 2012, Ch. 439, and resumed operation on June 27, 2017, when Stats. 2017, Ch. 25, repealed that amended version.)
-------------------------------------------

12302.25.

(a) On or before January 1, 2003, each county shall act as, or establish, an employer for in-home supportive service providers under Section 12302.2 for the purposes of Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 3500) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code and other applicable state or federal laws. Each county may utilize a public authority or nonprofit consortium as authorized under Section 12301.6, the contract mode as authorized under Sections 12302 and 12302.1, county administration of the individual provider mode as authorized
 under Sections 12302 and 12302.2 for purposes of acting as, or providing, an employer under Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 3500) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, county civil service personnel as authorized under Section 12302, or mixed modes of service authorized pursuant to this article and may establish regional agreements in establishing an employer for purposes of this subdivision for providers of in-home supportive services. Within 30 days of the effective date of this section, the department shall develop a timetable for implementation of this subdivision to ensure orderly compliance by counties. Recipients of in-home supportive services shall retain the right to choose the individuals that provide their care and to recruit, select, train, reject, or change any provider under the contract mode or to hire, fire, train, and supervise any provider under any other mode of service. Upon request of a recipient, and in addition to a county’s selected method of establishing an employer
 for in-home supportive service providers pursuant to this subdivision, counties with an IHSS caseload of more than 500 shall be required to offer an individual provider employer option.

(b) Nothing in this section shall prohibit any negotiations or agreement regarding collective bargaining or any wage and benefit enhancements.

(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect the state’s responsibility with respect to the state payroll system, unemployment insurance, or workers’ compensation and other provisions of Section 12302.2 for providers of in-home supportive services.

(d) Prior to implementing subdivision (a), a county may establish an advisory committee as authorized by Section 12301.3 and solicit recommendations from the advisory committee on the preferred mode or modes of service to be utilized in
 the county for in-home supportive services.

(e) If a county establishes an in-home supportive services advisory committee pursuant to Section 12301.3, the county shall take into account the advice and recommendations of the committee prior to making policy and funding decisions about the program on an ongoing basis.

(f) In implementing and administering this section, no county, public authority, nonprofit consortium, contractor, or a combination thereof, that delivers in-home supportive services shall reduce the hours of service for any recipient below the amount determined to be necessary under the uniform assessment guidelines established by the department.

(g) Any agreement between a county and an entity acting as an employer under subdivision (a) shall include a provision that requires that funds appropriated by
 the state for wage increases for in-home supportive services providers be used exclusively for that purpose. Counties or the state may undertake audits of the entities acting as employers under the terms of subdivision (a) to verify compliance with this subdivision.

(h) On or before January 15, 2003, each county shall provide the department with documentation that demonstrates compliance with the January 1, 2003, deadline specified in subdivision (a). The documentation shall include, but is not limited to, any of the following:

(1) The public authority ordinance and employee relations procedures.

(2) The invitations to bid and requests for proposal for contract services for the contract mode.

(3) An invitation to bid and request for proposal for the
 operation of a nonprofit consortium.

(4) A county board of supervisors’ resolution resolving that the county has chosen to act as the employer required by subdivision (a) either by utilizing county employees, as authorized by Section 12302, to provide in-home supportive services or through county administration of individual providers.

(5) Any combination of the documentation required under paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, that reflects the decision of a county to provide mixed modes of service as authorized under subdivision (a).

(i) Any county that is unable to provide the documentation required by subdivision (h) by January 15, 2003, may provide, on or before that date, a written notice to the department that does all of the following:

(1) Explains
 the county’s failure to provide the required documentation.

(2) Describes the county’s plan for coming into compliance with the requirements of this section.

(3) Includes a timetable for the county to come into compliance with this section, but in no case shall the timetable extend beyond March 31, 2003.

(j) Any county that fails to provide the documentation required by subdivision (h) and also fails to provide the written notice as allowed under subdivision (i), shall be deemed by operation of law to be the employer of IHSS individual providers for purposes of Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 3500) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code as of January 15, 2003.

(k) Any county that provides a written notice as allowed under subdivision (i),
 but fails to provide the documentation required under subdivision (h) by March 31, 2003, shall be deemed by operation of law to be the employer of IHSS individual providers for purposes of Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 3500) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code as of April 1, 2003.

(l) Any county deemed by operation of law, pursuant to subdivision (j) or (k), to be the employer of IHSS individual providers for purposes of Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 3500) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code shall continue to act in that capacity until the county notifies the department that it has established another employer as permitted by this section, and has provided the department with the documentation required under subdivision (h) demonstrating the change.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 8, Sec. 34.   (SB 72)   Effective March 24, 2011.   This version became inoperative on September 22, 2012, upon operation of the amendment by Stats. 2012, Ch. 439, and resumed operation on June 27, 2017, when Stats. 2017, Ch. 25, repealed that amended version.)
-------------------------------------------

12302.3.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, and in a manner consistent with the powers available to public authorities created under this article, the City and County of San Francisco may do any of the following:

(1) Increase the wages of all in-home supportive services providers.

(2) Subject to the requirements of federal law, use county-only funds to fund county and state shares to meet federal
 financial participation requirements necessary to obtain any available personal care services reimbursement under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396 et seq.) (Medicaid).

(3) Provide in-home supportive services workers with any wage increase the city and county may appropriate, as long as this amount is in accordance with the provisions of the Medi-Cal State Plan Amendment 94-006, as approved by the federal Health Care Financing Administration. The county-only funds shall be used exclusively to increase workers’ wages and to pay any proportionate share of employer taxes and current benefits, and to pay for the cost of state and county administration of these activities as provided for in paragraph (5). Notwithstanding Section 12302.1, any wage increase for those workers employed under contract shall be passed through by the contractor to the workers, subject to the limitations specified in this paragraph. The state
 shall continue to provide payroll functions for all workers who are currently individual providers unless and until the in-home supportive services public authority is operational.

(4) Claim the administrative costs of the wage passthrough in accordance with the department’s claiming requirements.

(5) If that federal financial participation is available for county-only payroll moneys, the following shall apply:

(A) If additional payroll costs will be incurred by the state due to the receipt and payment of federal funds, the department shall provide the city and county with a detailed estimate of the additional costs of the provision of payroll functions associated with the processing of federal funds. If the city and county elects to pay the additional costs, the department will provide these payroll functions. If
 the city and county does not elect to pay the additional costs, the department and the city and county may seek another, mutually satisfactory arrangement.

(B) If that federal financial participation is not available, the department shall continue to perform the existing payroll functions provided on July 28, 1995, at no additional cost to the city and county.

(b) (1) This section shall not be implemented with respect to any particular wage increase pursuant to subdivision (a) unless the department has obtained the approval of the State Department of Health Services for that wage increase prior to its execution to determine that it is consistent with federal law and to ensure federal financial participation for the services under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396 et seq.).

(2) The Director of Health Services shall seek any federal waivers or approvals necessary for implementation of this section under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396 et seq.).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 83, Sec. 206.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

12302.4.

A county, in receiving bids for a contract pursuant to Sections 12302, 12302.1, and 12303, may evaluate all or any bidders to determine their responsibility, and their responsiveness to the requirements of the bidding document. The county may take all of the following into account:

(a) Whether the bidder possesses adequate financial resources, or the ability to obtain those resources as required before the beginning of the performance of the contract.

(b) Whether the bidder has the ability to comply with the proposed delivery
 and performance schedule, taking into consideration available expertise and any other existing business commitments.

(c) Whether the bidder has any record of unsatisfactory performance. In determining if a bidder has a record of unsatisfactory performance, the bidder shall submit a list to the county of all prior in-home supportive services contracts awarded, if any. A county may review past contracts, if any, to determine if the bidder’s past in-home supportive services contract performance has been unsatisfactory.

(d) Whether the bidder has any record of lack of integrity or poor business ethics.

(e) Whether the bidder is otherwise qualified and eligible to receive an award under applicable statutes and regulations.

(f) Whether the bid substantially
 and materially complies with all requirements of the county’s bidding document.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 12302.2 (as added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1085) by Stats. 1988, Ch. 160, Sec. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

12302.5.

(a) Counties may establish entities or agents to act on behalf of the employers for those recipients who are designated as the employer of the in-home supportive services worker and who elect not to, or who are unable to, ensure compliance with all applicable federal, state, and county wage, hour, and workplace laws.

(b) Any entity or agent established pursuant to this section shall not restrict or interfere with the right of a recipient to select, replace, and terminate the
 employment of his or her own provider of in-home supportive services and to set his or her own service schedule.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1006, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

12303.

A contract pursuant to Section 12302 shall include the following provisions:

(a) The cost of the service shall not exceed by more than 10 percent the allowable cost of the service as determined by the State Department of Social Services.

(b) The provider agency shall agree to give preference to the training and employment of recipients of public assistance or other low-income persons who would qualify for public assistance in the absence of such employment.

(c) The
 cost of the purchase of such service will qualify, where possible, for the maximum federal reimbursement.

(d) A bond may be obtained to secure payment of wages in the event that bankruptcy, liquidation, embezzlement, fraud, or other factors prevent payment of wage claims to homemakers, homemaker chore workers, or other in-home supportive service personnel.

The provisions of this section shall not restrict the right of a chartered county from providing a civil service classification for in-home supportive service personnel.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1399, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

12303.4.

(a) Any aged, blind, or disabled individual who is eligible for assistance under this chapter or Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 12500), and who is not described in Section 12304, shall receive services under this article which do not exceed the maximum of 195 hours per month.

(b) Any aged, blind, or disabled individual who is eligible for assistance under this chapter or Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 12500), who is in need, as determined by the county welfare
 department, of at least 20 hours per week of the services defined in Section 12304, shall be eligible to receive services under this article, the total of which shall not exceed a maximum of 283 hours per month.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 90, Sec. 8.   Effective July 12, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

12303.6.

(a) No adjustment shall be made under this article for the 1990–91 fiscal year to reflect any change in the cost of living.

(b) Any cost-of-living adjustment under this article for the 1991–92 fiscal year and any fiscal year thereafter pursuant to Section 12303.5 shall not include any adjustment to reflect increases for the cost of living for the 1990–91 fiscal year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 457, Sec. 3.   Effective July 31, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

12303.7.

Any aged, or disabled applicant or recipient who is eligible for assistance under this article, whose disabilities prevent the use of cooking facilities at home, shall be given the option to receive an allowance of forty-nine dollars ($49) per month for an individual and ninety-eight dollars ($98) per month for a married couple in lieu of the appropriate in-home food preparation and consumption services. The allowance under this section shall be in addition to any amount that the applicant or recipient is entitled to under this chapter. This allowance shall not have the effect of exceeding the total cost maximum of Sections
 12303.5 and 12304. Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the applicant’s or recipient’s right to receive the allowance under this section and all other homemaker and chore services.

The State Department of Social Services shall adjust the amount of the allowance under this section on July 1, 1984, and each year thereafter to reflect cost-of-living changes subsequent to January 1, 1983, as provided under Section 12303. 5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 323, Sec. 118.   Effective July 1, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

12304.

(a) An individual who is eligible for services subject to the maximum amount specified in subdivision (b) of Section 12303.4 and who is capable of handling his or her own financial and legal affairs shall be given the option of hiring and paying his or her own provider of in-home supportive services. For this purpose the individual shall be entitled to receive a monthly cash payment in advance not to exceed an amount to reimburse providers for the maximum amount of hours specified in subdivision (b) of Section 12303.4, which is in addition to
 his or her grant, if any. An individual who is not capable of handling his or her own financial and legal affairs shall be entitled to receive the cash payment through his or her guardian, conservator, or protective payee. 

(b) In no event shall the maximum total cost for services and advance cash payment for one individual recipient under subdivision (b) of Section 12303.4 and subdivision (a) exceed an amount to reimburse providers for the maximum hours specified in subdivision (b) of Section 12303.4. 

(c) The county welfare department shall inform in writing any individual who is potentially eligible for services under this section of his or her right to the services. 

(d) For purposes of subdivision (b) of Section 12303.4, a recipient who is eligible for services subject to the maximum amount specified in
 subdivision (b) of Section 12303.4 is one who requires in-home supportive care of at least 20 hours per week to carry out any or all of the following:

(1) Routine bodily functions, such as bowel and bladder care and respiration assistance.

(2) Dressing, oral hygiene, and grooming. 

(3) Preparation and consumption of food and meal cleanup for individuals who require assistance with the preparation and consumption of food.

(4) Moving into and out of bed, other assistance in transferring, turning in bed, and other repositioning.

(5) Bathing, routine bed baths, and washing. 

(6) Ambulation and care and assistance with
 prostheses.

(7) Rubbing of skin to promote circulation. 

(8) Paramedical services.

(9) Any other function of daily living as determined by the director.

This determination of need shall be supported by a medical report when requested and shall be prepared at the expense of the State Department of Social Services.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 96, Sec. 6) by Stats. 1992, Ch. 722, Sec. 57.   Effective September 15, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

12304.1.

In the selection of providers to perform services pursuant to this article, preference shall be given to any qualified individual provider who is chosen by any recipient of personal care services as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 12300.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 939, Sec. 3.   Effective September 28, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

12304.2.

(a) A recipient who receives services under this article through either a contract or managed care provider may, subject to program requirements, select any qualified person to provide care under this article.

(b) For purposes of this section, “qualified person” means any employee of the contract or managed care provider through which the recipient may receive services under this article who is available and eligible to provide the services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 349, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

12304.3.

Any recipient of services under this article who has received benefits under this article for at least one year, and who hires and pays his or her own service providers, as permitted under subdivision (b) of Section 12304, may receive his or her grant under this article through an electronic transfer. The Controller shall offer electronic transfer services to these recipients as soon as the option of electronic transfer is available to state employees for the receipt of wages.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1141, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

12304.4.

(a) The department shall establish a program of direct deposit by electronic transfer for payments to in-home supportive services providers. A provider may choose to receive payments via direct deposit at the provider’s option. The department, the Controller, and the California Health and Human Services Agency shall make all necessary automation changes to allow for payment by direct deposit.

(b) On or before March 31, 2008, the department shall complete those items pertaining to the implementation of direct deposit over which they have independent control, or those items that do not depend on ongoing coordination with the office of the Controller in order to be completed. Examples of these items include, but are not limited to, rulemaking Case Management
 Information and Payroll Systems (CMIPS) modifications, provider notifications, and all-county letters. The department and the office of the Controller shall cooperate fully on coordination, implementation, and testing, on a timeframe that shall not delay implementation of the project. Notwithstanding any other law, direct deposit for in-home supportive services providers shall be implemented on or before June 30, 2008.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, a person entitled to the receipt of direct payment as an individual provider pursuant to Section 12302.2 for providing in-home supportive services may authorize payment to be directly deposited by electronic fund transfer into the person’s account at the financial institution of the person’s choice under a program for direct deposit by electronic transfer established by the department.

(d) (1) (A) Notwithstanding Sections 212 and 213 of the Labor Code, providers entitled to the receipt of direct wage payment as an individual provider pursuant to Section 12302.2 for providing in-home supportive services, or providers who provide waiver personal care services pursuant to Section 14132.97, shall receive payment of wages only by direct deposit or provider card, with either method chosen at the preference of each provider.

(B) Subparagraph (A) becomes effective by the later of the following dates:

(i) July 1, 2021.

(ii) An alternative date identified by the department, with notification provided to the Legislature, relative to the completion of statewide implementation of the federal electronic visit verification requirement.

(2) (A) The department shall encourage providers to enroll in either direct deposit or a provider card in preparation for, and in advance of, the effective date of the requirement in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1).

(B) Each provider shall identify a bank account into which wages can be direct deposited, select a prepaid account available in the private market that complies with applicable federal and state laws through which the provider can receive wages, or a provider card made available through the process described in subdivision (e) through which the provider can receive wages.

(e) (1) The State Department of Social Services shall issue a request for proposal for one or more provider card issuers to offer to providers so the provider may enroll in a provider card service in order to access the provider’s wages.

(2) A provider card issuer selected by the department pursuant to this subdivision shall comply with all of the following:

(A) Comply with all of the requirements, and provide a provider with all of the consumer protections, that apply to a provider card under the rules implementing the federal Electronic Fund Transfer Act (EFTA) (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1693 et seq.), or other rules subsequently adopted under the EFTA that apply to payroll cards, except that the disclosures required under federal law to provide notice of the ban on compulsory use under Section 1693k(2) of Title 15 of the United States Code may be modified, as appropriate, to reflect the relationship of the provider to the department.

(B) Satisfy the requirements for passthrough deposit or share insurance so that the funds available on the provider card are
 eligible for insurance for the benefit of the provider provided by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation in accordance with Part 330 (commencing with Section 330.1) of Title 12 of the Code of Federal Regulations or by the National Credit Union Share Insurance Fund in accordance with Part 745 (commencing with Section 745.0) of Title 12 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(C) Minimize charges and fees for providers using the card and not impose any of the following fees, or any other fee that may be specified by the department in the request for proposals:

(i) An application, initiation, loading, participation, or other fee to receive wages or to obtain the provider card.

(ii) A fee for a point-of-sale transaction, unless the fee is charged by a person that accepts credit or debit cards for the transaction and the
 provider initiated the transaction.

(iii) A fee to withdraw funds from a teller or an automated teller machine at any financial institution that is in the provider card issuer’s network.

(iv) An overdraft, shortage, or low-balance fee or charge, or any fee or finance charge for any form of credit or overdraft that is automatically repaid from the provider card after delivery of the payment, including, but not limited to, a loan against future payments or a cash advance on future payments.

(v) A fee for a declined transaction.

(vi) A fee for inactivity.

(vii) A fee for the first three telephone calls to a live customer service representative per pay period.

(viii) A fee to the access balance or other provider card information online, by an interactive voice response system, or by any other automated system offered in conjunction with the provider card, or at an automated teller machine at any financial institution that is in the provider card issuer’s network.

(ix) A fee to close the provider card or disburse the remaining provider card balance.

(x) A fee to provide one replacement card each year.
